Utah statutes.
38-3-2.   Priority of lessor's lien.

The lien provided for in this chapter shall be preferred to all other liens or claims except claims for taxes and liens of mechanics under Title 38, Chapter 1, perfected security interests, and claims of employees for wages which are preferred by law; provided, that when a lessee shall be adjudicated a bankrupt, or shall make an assignment for the benefit of creditors, or when his property shall be put into the possession of a receiver, the lien herein provided for shall be limited to the rent for 90 days prior thereto.

